Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB921.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, a public school teacher, or a
teacher employed at the Kentucky School for the Blind or Kentucky School for
the Deaf operated by the Department of Education, who holds a professional
certificate for teaching exceptional children, and who is employed in a classroom
teacher position requiring the certificate, shall receive an annual salary
supplement of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each year the conditions are
met during the life of the certificate. If an annual supplement amount
appropriated by the General Assembly is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000),
the local board may provide an additional supplement up to the amount required
for the total annual supplement to equal ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The
supplement shall be added to:
(a) The teacher's base salary on the local board's single salary schedule and
shall be considered in the calculation for contributions to the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System; or
(b) The state-employed teacher's base salary and shall be considered in the
calculation for contributions to the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System.
(2) If a teacher who holds a professional certificate for teaching exceptional children
becomes no longer employed in a classroom teacher position requiring the
certificate, the supplement provided under subsection (1) of this section shall
cease.
(3) A local board of education or the Department of Education shall request
reimbursement for these purposes from the fund to support education excellence
described in KRS 157.330
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed